District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2332

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 24, 1970, 84 Stat. 1579, Pub. L. 91-587, § 2
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1832.
1973 Ed., § 31-1072.